Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.050

Pooling of loans.

The authority is authorized to develop and conduct a program or programs to promote small business and agricultural financing in the state through the pooling of loans or portions of loans made or guaranteed through programs administered by federal agencies including the small business or farmers home administrations. For such purpose, the authority may acquire from eligible banking organizations and other financial intermediaries who make or hold loans made or guaranteed through programs administered by the federal small business or farmers home administrations all or portions of such loans, and the authority may contract or coordinate with parties authorized to acquire or pool loans made or guaranteed by a federal agency or with parties authorized to administer such loan or guarantee programs.

[ 1990 c 53 s 3; 1989 c 279 s 6.]